District of Columbia statutes.
3-1353

Appointment; terms of office; removal; compensation.

(a)

The Commission shall consist of the following 9 members:

(1)

The Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department, or his or her designee at the level of Assistant Chief;

(2)

The Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking, or his or her designee at the level of Deputy Commissioner;

(3)

The Director of the Department of Motor Vehicles, or his or her designee at the level of Deputy Director; and

(4)

Six members appointed by the Mayor, subject to the advice and consent of the Council, in accordance with § 1-523.01, as follows:

(A)

Two public members who shall be both owners of registered motor vehicles in and residents of the District of Columbia;

(B)

One representative of an insurance company that issues motor vehicle insurance policies in the District of Columbia;

(C)

Two members with significant experience in motor vehicle theft issues; and

(D)

One member who is either a fleet owner or a rental vehicle carrier representative doing business in the District of Columbia.

(b)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the members appointed pursuant to subsection (a)(4) of this section shall serve for a term of 3 years.

(c)

The terms of the members first appointed pursuant to subsection (a)(4) of this section shall be as follows:

(1)

One member appointed pursuant to subsection (a)(4)(A) of this section and the member appointed pursuant to subsection (a)(4)(B) of this section shall be appointed to terms to expire on June 30, 2009.

(2)

One member appointed pursuant to subsection (a)(4)(A) of this section and one member appointed pursuant to subsection (a)(4)(C) of this section shall be appointed to terms to expire on June 30, 2010.

(3)

One member appointed pursuant to subsection (a)(4)(C) of this section and the member appointed pursuant to subsection (a)(4)(D) of this section shall be appointed to terms to expire on June 30, 2011.

(d)

Members of the Commission shall be eligible for reappointment.

(e)

A vacancy on the Commission shall be filled in the same manner that the original appointment was made. A person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the unexpired term of the original appointment, but may be reappointed to one or more additional terms.

(f)

The Mayor shall designate one of the members appointed pursuant to subsection (a)(4)(A) of this section to serve as Chair of the Commission, with the advice and consent of the Council by resolution. The Chair shall be designated to serve for a period of 3 years or until the expiration of the member’s term, whichever shall occur earlier. The Chair shall be eligible for reappointment.

(g)

(1)

The Mayor shall remove a member of the Commission for failing to establish or maintain District residency (where District residency is a requirement of appointment). The Mayor may remove a member of the Commission for misconduct or neglect of duty, or for other cause as defined by the Commission in its bylaws.

(2)

A member of the Commission who is indicted for the commission of a felony shall be automatically suspended from serving on the Commission. Upon a determination of guilt, the term of the Commission member shall be automatically terminated. Upon acquittal or dismissal of the prosecution, the term of the Commission member shall be automatically reinstated.

(h)

Members of the Commission shall serve without compensation, but shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for reasonable expenses incurred while actually performing duties vested in the Commission.

(i)

A quorum shall consist of the presence of 5 or more members. A quorum shall be necessary for the Commission to conduct its business.

(j)

The Commission shall meet at least quarterly.

(k)

All meetings of the Commission shall be subject to § 1-207.42.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-197, § 4, 55 DCR 6277